Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.130

Voter violations.

Any person who:

(1) Knowingly provides false information on an application for voter registration under any provision of this title;

(2) Knowingly makes or attests to a false declaration as to his or her qualifications as a voter;

(3) Knowingly causes or permits himself or herself to be registered using the name of another person;

(4) Knowingly causes himself or herself to be registered under two or more different names;

(5) Knowingly causes himself or herself to be registered in two or more counties;

(6) Offers to pay another person to assist in registering voters, where payment is based on a fixed amount of money per voter registration;

(7) Accepts payment for assisting in registering voters, where payment is based on a fixed amount of money per voter registration; or

(8) Knowingly causes any person to be registered or causes any registration to be transferred or canceled except as authorized under this title,

is guilty of a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2107. Prior: 1994 c 57 s 25; 1991 c 81 s 12; 1990 c 143 s 12; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 110; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.200; prior: 1933 c 1 s 27; RRS s 5114-27; prior: 1893 c 45 s 5; 1889 p 418 s 16; RRS s 5136. Formerly RCW 29.07.410, 29.85.200.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.